Massachusetts, session 194th, H2191.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 19A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding after
Section 4D the following new section:-
Section 4E: In establishing rates of payment for homemaker and personal care
homemaker services pursuant to the second paragraph of section 13C of chapter 118E of the
M.G.L. and in implementing such rate regulations, the executive of office shall require that the
minimum wage paid to employees of home care agencies providing such services shall be no less
than $25 per hour in the first rate year and that such minimum wage shall be adjusted by the rate
of inflation for each subsequent rate year. Such adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated
to the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers or
a successor index, for the 12 months prior to each rate year as calculated by the United States
department of labor. When establishing rates of payment for homemaker and personal care
homemaker services, the executive office shall adjust such rates to ensure that the rates fully
of 2

account for the cost to providers of paying such enhanced minimum wage. Nothing in this
section shall be construed as limiting consideration of other governmental mandates or operating
costs that affect the cost of providing services pursuant to section 4 of chapter 19A of the
General Laws.
SECTION 2. Section 13C of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new paragraph:-
In establishing such rates of payment pursuant to the second paragraph of this section and
in implementing rate regulations, the executive office shall require that the minimum wage paid
to employees of social service program providers receiving such payments shall be no less than
$25 per hour in the first rate year and that such minimum wage shall be adjusted by the rate of
inflation for each subsequent rate year. Such adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to
the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers or a
successor index, for the 12 months prior to each rate year as calculated by the United States
department of labor. When establishing rates of payment for social service programs, the
secretary of the executive office shall adjust such rates of payment to ensure that the rates fully
account for the cost to providers of paying such enhanced minimum wage.
SECTION 3. The executive office of health and human services shall complete the
processes above and file for emergency adoption of such amended regulations no later than 180
days after passage of this Act.
of 2